Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201947-1007
Report; contents.

On or before June 1, 2020, and each June 1 thereafter, each administrator of a detention facility shall submit a report describing any use of restraints on a pregnant prisoner or detainee in the preceding calendar year. The Director of Correctional Services shall submit such report to the Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System. An administrator of a detention facility operated by a political subdivision shall submit such report to the Jail Standards Board. The report shall not contain individually identifying information of any prisoner or detainee. Such reports shall be made available for public inspection.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 7.